Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 3. Loans

Cross references. —

As to authority of state and its political subdivisions to invest in federal farm and housing securities, see §

9-4-831

.

§ 11-34-301.
Water
development projects; nonnegotiable debentures; loans to small projects. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 141, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-655; Laws 1959, ch. 79, § 3; 1967, ch. 15, § 1; 1969, ch. 94, § 19; 1971, ch. 217, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 54, § 1; 1975, ch. 122, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-402; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 1999, ch. 75, § 1; 2000, ch. 65, § 2; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 11-34-302.
Water development projects; loans authorized; terms and conditions;
assistance by water development commission. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 141, §§ 1, 2, 4; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-656, 11-657, 11-658; Laws 1959, ch. 79, §§ 1, 2; 1961, ch. 203, § 1; 1969, ch. 94, §§ 20, 21, 22; 1971, ch. 31, § 1, ch. 216, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 122, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-39-403 to 11-39-405; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1985, ch. 173, § 1; 1986, ch. 84, § 1; 1988, ch. 79, § 11; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2003, ch. 158, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 11-34-303.
Area redevelopment programs; terms; rules and regulations; fund source. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 84, §§ 1, 2, 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-658.1 to 11-658.3; Laws 1969, ch. 94, § 23; 1975, ch. 122, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-406 to 11-39-408; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1998, ch. 6, § 3; ch. 13, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 11-34-304.
Lamb processing facility; loans authorized; maximum amount; interest and terms of loans. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 25, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 11-34-305.
Lamb processing facility; approval and regulation of loans; security. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 25, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 11-34-306.
Loans
for hydro-power development; terms; rules and regulations; fund source. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 109, § 1; 2016 ch. 110, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; repealed by 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.